dictsource/jp_rules
.group ひ
	ひ	Ci		// hi
	ひい	Ci:		// hī
	ひぃ	Ci:		// hī
	ひー	Ci:		// hī
	ひ (L21	C		// hy([auo]
	び	bi		// bi
	びい	bi:		// bī
	びぃ	bi:		// bī
	びー	bi:		// bī
	び (L21	b_j		// by([auo]
	ぴ	pi		// pi
	ぴい	pi:		// pī
	ぴぃ	pi:		// pī
	ぴー	pi:		// pī
	ぴ (L21	p_j		// py([auo]

.group ふ
	ふ	p\\M_Bo		// fu
	ふう	p\\M_Bo:	// fū
	ふぅ	p\\M_Bo:	// fū
	ふー	p\\M_Bo:	// fū
	ぶ	bM_Bo		// bu
	ぶう	bM_Bo:		// bū
	ぶぅ	bM_Bo:		// bū
	ぶー	bM_Bo:		// bū
	ぷ	pM_Bo		// pu
	ぷう	pM_Bo:		// pū
	ぷぅ	pM_Bo:		// pū
	ぷー	pM_Bo:		// pū

.group へ
	へ	he_o		// he
	へえ	he_o:		// hē
	へぇ	he_o:		// hē
	へー	he_o:		// hē
	べ	be_o		// be
	べえ	be_o:		// bē
	べぇ	be_o:		// bē
	べー	be_o:		// bē
	ぺ	pe_o		// pe
	ぺえ	pe_o:		// pē
	ぺぇ	pe_o:		// pē
	ぺー	pe_o:		// pē

.group ほ
	ほ	ho_o		// ho
	ほお	ho_o:		// hō
	ほぉ	ho_o:		// hō
	ほー	ho_o:		// hō
	ぼ	bo_o		// bo
	ぼお	bo_o:		// bō
	ぼぉ	bo_o:		// bō
	ぼー	bo_o:		// bō
	ぽ	po_o		// po
	ぽお	po_o:		// pō
	ぽぉ	po_o:		// pō
	ぽー	po_o:		// pō

.group ま
	ま	ma_"		// ma
	まあ	ma_":		// mā
	まぁ	ma_":		// mā
	まー	ma_":		// mā

.group み
	み	mi		// mi
	みい	mi:		// mī
	みぃ	mi:		// mī
	みー	mi:		// mī
	み (L21	m_j		// my([auo]

.group む
	む	mM_Bo		// mu
	むう	mM_Bo:		// mū
	むぅ	mM_Bo:		// mū
	むー	mM_Bo:		// mū

.group め
	め	me_o		// me
	めえ	me_o:		// mē
	めぇ	me_o:		// mē
	めー	me_o:		// mē

.group も
	も	mo_o		// mo
	もお	mo_o:		// mō
	もぉ	mo_o:		// mō
	もー	mo_o:		// mō

.group や
	や	ja_"		// ya
	やあ	ja_":		// yā
	やぁ	ja_":		// yā
	やー	ja_":		// yā

.group ゆ
	ゆ	jM_Bo		// yu
	ゆう	jM_Bo:		// yū
	ゆぅ	jM_Bo:		// yū
	ゆー	jM_Bo:		// yū

.group 𛀁
	𛀁	je_o		// ye (archaic)
	𛀁え	je_o:		// yē (archaic)
	𛀁ぇ	je_o:		// yē (archaic)
	𛀁ー	je_o:		// yē (archaic)

.group よ
	よ	jo_o		// yo
	よお	jo_o:		// yō
	よぉ	jo_o:		// yō
	よー	jo_o:		// yō

.group ら
	ら	r`a_"		// ra
	らあ	r`a_":		// rā
	らぁ	r`a_":		// rā
	らー	r`a_":		// rā

.group り
	り	r`i		// ri
	りい	r`i:		// rī
	りぃ	r`i:		// rī
	りー	r`i:		// rī
	り (L21	r`_ja_"		// ry([auo]

.group る
	る	r`M_Bo		// ru
	るう	r`M_Bo:		// rū
	るぅ	r`M_Bo:		// rū
	るー	r`M_Bo:		// rū

.group れ
	れ	r`e_o		// re
	れえ	r`e_o:		// rē
	れぇ	r`e_o:		// rē
	れー	r`e_o:		// rē

.group ろ
	ろ	r`o_o		// ro
	ろお	r`o_o:		// rō
	ろぉ	r`o_o:		// rō
	ろー	r`o_o:		// rō

.group わ
	わ	wa_"		// wa
	わあ	wa_":		// wā
	わぁ	wa_":		// wā
	わー	wa_":		// wā

.group ゐ
	ゐ	i		// wi (obsolete)
	ゐい	i:		// wī (obsolete)
	ゐぃ	i:		// wī (obsolete)
	ゐー	i:		// wī (obsolete)

.group ゑ
	ゑ	we_o		// we (obsolete)
	ゑえ	we_o:		// wē (obsolete)
	ゑぇ	we_o:		// wē (obsolete)
	ゑー	we_o:		// wē (obsolete)

.group を
	を	o_o		// wo
	をお	o_o:		// wō
	をぉ	o_o:		// wō
	をー	o_o:		// wō

.group ん
		ん		N\\	//    n
		ん	(L01	N	//    n (k
		ん	(L02	N	//    n (g
		ん	(L03	u~	//    n (s
	い)	ん	(L03	i~	// i) n (s
		ん	(L04	u~	//    n (sh
	い)	ん	(L04	i~	// i) n (sh
		ん	(L05	n	//    n (z
		ん	(L06	n	//    n (j
		ん	(L07	n	//    n (t
		ん	(L08	n	//    n (ch
		ん	(L09	n	//    n (ts
		ん	(L10	n	//    n (d
		ん	(L11	n	//    n (n
		ん	(L12	u~	//    n (h
	い)	ん	(L12	i~	// i) n (h
		ん	(L13	u~	//    n (f
	い)	ん	(L13	i~	// i) n (f
		ん	(L14	m	//    n (b
		ん	(L15	m	//    n (p
		ん	(L16	m	//    n (m
		ん	(L17	u~	//    n (y
	い)	ん	(L17	i~	// i) n (y
		ん	(L18	n	//    n (r
		ん	(L19	u~	//    n (w
	い)	ん	(L19	i~	// i) n (w
		ん	(L20	u~	//    n ([vowel]
	い)	ん	(L20	i~	// i) n ([vowel]

.group っ
	っ	(_	?
	っ	(L01	k	// k.k
	っ	(L02	g	// g.g
	っ	(L03	s	// s.s
	っ	(L04	s\\	// s.sh
	っ	(L05	z	// z.z
	っ	(L06	d	// d.j
	っ	(L07	t	// t.t
	っ	(L08	t	// t.ch
	っ	(L09	t	// t.ts
	っ	(L10	d	// d.d
	っ	(L14	b	// b.b
	っ	(L15	p	// p.p
	っ	(L16	m	// m.m
	っ	(L18	r	// r.r
